Hawaii, session 2026, HB2013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public housing residents deserve to live in environments that are safe, secure, and supportive of family stability, health, and well-being.  Many public housing projects experience disproportionate impacts from violent crime, illegal firearms, reckless driving, and unauthorized access, which undermine resident safety and quality of life.  Modern safety technologies such as acoustic gunshot detection systems and automated license plate recognition cameras have been used by jurisdictions nationwide to improve emergency response times, deter criminal activity, and support law enforcement investigations when appropriately regulated.  However, the implementation of safety technologies must be balanced with strong safeguards to protect civil liberties, privacy, and prevent misuse or discriminatory surveillance.  The legislature further finds that coordinated deployment of safety measures in partnership with public housing residents and law enforcement can improve trust, accountability, and outcomes. The purpose of this Act is to enhance safety in public housing statewide by requiring the Hawaii public housing authority to implement targeted safety and security measures, with appropriate oversight and privacy protections. SECTION 2.  Chapter 356D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  public housing; SAFETY technologies §356D-     Definitions.  For the purposes of this part: "Acoustic gunshot detection systems" means any technology designed to detect, locate, and report the sound of suspected firearm discharges. "Housing project" means a public housing project, elder or elderly housing, or state low-income housing project as defined in section 356D-51. "License plate recognition system" means any camera-based system capable of capturing images of motor vehicle license plates and related metadata for identification and safety purposes. "Safety technologies" means acoustic gunshot detection systems, license plate recognition systems, fixed or mobile security cameras, lighting improvements, access-control systems, or any other tool or technology adopted by the authority to improve safety at a housing project. §356D-     Mandatory comprehensive safety plan.  (a) The authority shall develop and implement a comprehensive safety plan for all housing projects in the State. (b)  The plan shall include at a minimum the installation and use of: (1)  Acoustic gunshot detection systems in housing projects with documented incidents of gun-related violence; (2)  License plate recognition system cameras at vehicular entry and exit points at housing projects, where feasible; and (3)  Any other appropriate safety measures, including but not limited to fixed or mobile surveillance cameras at building entrances and common areas, improved exterior lighting, controlled access systems, and emergency call or alert systems. §356D-     Privacy, civil liberty, and data safeguards.  The authority shall adopt a written policy governing the use, storage, sharing, and retention of data collected through safety technologies.  The policy shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Prohibiting the use of safety technologies for generalized surveillance unrelated to public safety; (2)  Limiting the retention of data acquired through the use of safety technologies to      days, except where required for an active investigation or court order; (3)  Restricting access to data acquired through the use of safety technologies to authorized personnel only; (4)  Prohibiting the use of data for immigration enforcement or civil or non-criminal purposes; and (5)  Procedures to prevent discriminatory or selective enforcement. §356D-     Residents; notice; coordination.  (a) The authority shall notify residents of the presence and purpose of safety technologies implemented at the housing project by posting clear signage throughout the housing project and engaging in community outreach. (b)  The authority shall engage with resident councils, resident advisory boards, or tenant associations prior to the implementation of any safety technologies and shall periodically meet with resident councils, resident advisory boards, or tenant associations after the implementation of any safety technologies to gather feedback and address concerns. §356D-     Coordination with law enforcement.  The authority may coordinate with the appropriate county police departments for the limited purpose of emergency response and criminal investigations consistent with the purposes of this part. §356D-     Safety technologies, implementation; prioritization.  The authority shall identify and prioritize the implementation of safety technologies in housing projects based on: (1)  Crime data and calls for service; (2)  Resident safety concerns and complaints; (3)  History of gun related incidents or other violent incidents; (4)  Traffic safety issues, including reckless driving or unauthorized vehicle access; and (5)  Availability of infrastructure to support safety technologies. §356D-     Funding. In addition to any funds appropriated for the purposes of this part, the authority may seek federal grants, accept gifts or private funding, or enter into a public-private partnership consistent with state law. §356D-     Annual reports.  The authority shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session that includes: (1)  Locations where safety technologies have been deployed; (2)  Types of safety technologies used; (3)  Reported safety outcomes and response times; (4)  Resident feedback and concerns; (5)  Privacy compliance measures; (6)  Recommendations for expansion, modification, or improvement of safety technologies; and (7)  If the authority obtained any federal grants, received any gifts or private funds, or entered into a public-private partnership to carry out the purposes of this part." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  The purchase, installation, and maintenance of safety technologies at housing projects statewide; (2)  Training for employees of the Hawaii public housing authority; (3)  Data security and privacy compliance; (4)  Community outreach and education; and (5)  Program evaluation. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii public housing authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________